Maine, session 132, LD2109.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §1, sub-§23-C is enacted to read:
23-C. Public education. "Public education" means education that:
A. Is provided primarily at public expense;
B. Meets all state and federal requirements for education for enrolled students;
C. Is provided to students for free in every grade level from kindergarten to grade 12;
and
D. Is provided in accordance with section 1001, subsection 8.
Sec. 2. 20-A MRSA §2951, sub-§3, as amended by PL 1985, c. 797, §25, is further
amended to read:
3. Incorporated; located within State. Is incorporated under the laws of the State of
Maine or of the United States and, notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, if
the instructional facility and administrative offices are located within the State;
Sec. 3. 20-A MRSA §15689-F, sub-§3, as amended by PL 2013, c. 581, §11, is
further amended to read:
3. Casino revenues. If the annual funding for public education instruction for children
in public preschool programs and public education for children in kindergarten and grades
one to 12 is supported by casino revenues credited to the department pursuant to Title 8,
section 1036, the department shall journal expenditures from the General Purpose Aid for
Local Schools, General Fund account to the K-12 Essential Programs and Services, Other
Special Revenue Funds account to meet financial obligations and for purposes of cash flow.
Sec. 4. Approval for receipt of public funds by private schools not located
within State; students currently enrolled. Notwithstanding the Maine Revised
Statutes, Title 20-A, section 2951, subsection 3, a private school that is not located within
the State that was approved for tuition purposes pursuant to Title 20-A, section 2951 prior
Page 1 - 132LR2619(03)

to the effective date of this Act at which a student from the State is enrolled pursuant to
Title 20-A, section 5204, subsection 4 as of the effective date of this Act may continue to
receive the tuition rate for that student as calculated pursuant to Title 20-A, section 5806
until the student has completed the student’s secondary school education at the private
school, as long as the private school continues to meet all requirements for approval under
Title 20-A, section 2951 other than the requirements of Title 20-A, section 2951, subsection
3.
Page 2 - 132LR2619(03)